Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7163.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-7-23 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-7 entitled "Foundation
Level School Support [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
16-7-23. Community requirements — Adequate minimum budget provision.
(a) The school committee’s budget provisions of each community for current expenditures
in each budget year shall provide for an amount from all sources sufficient to support the basic
program and all other approved programs shared by the state. Each community shall contribute
local funds to its school committee in an amount not less than its local contribution for schools in
the previous fiscal year except to the extent permitted by §§ 16-7-23.1 and 16-7-23.2. Provided,
that for the fiscal years 2010 and 2011 each community shall contribute to its school committee in
an amount not less than ninety-five percent (95.0%) of its local contribution for schools for the
fiscal year 2009. Calculation of the annual local contribution shall not include Medicaid revenues
received by the municipality or district pursuant to chapter 8 of title 40. A community that has a
decrease in enrollment may compute maintenance of effort on a per-pupil rather than on an
aggregate basis when determining its local contribution; furthermore, a community that experiences
a nonrecurring expenditure for its schools may deduct the nonrecurring expenditure in computing
its maintenance of effort. The deduction of nonrecurring expenditures shall be with the approval of
the commissioner. Provided, however, that notwithstanding any provision of this title to the
contrary, debt service that is no longer carried on the books of any school district shall not be

included in any school district’s annual budget, nor shall nonrecurring debt service be included in
maintenance of effort as set forth in this chapter, nor shall any nonrecurring debt service be included
in the operating budget of any school district. For the purposes set forth above, nonrecurring capital
lease payments shall be considered nonrecurring debt service. The courts of this state shall enforce
this section by means of injunctive relief.
(b) Districts’ annual maintenance expenditures must meet the requirements of subsection
(b)(1), (b)(2), or (b)(3) of this section.
(1) A minimum of three percent (3%) of the operating budget shall be dedicated exclusively
for maintenance expenditures as defined in § 16-7-36(7) provided that for FY 2019, that amount
shall be one percent (1%), for FY 2020, that amount shall be one and one-half percent (1.5%), for
FY 2021 that amount shall be two percent (2%), and for FY 2022 that amount shall be two and
one-half percent (2.5%).
(2) A minimum of three percent (3%) of the replacement value shall be dedicated
exclusively for maintenance expenditures as defined in § 16-7-36(7) provided that for FY 2019,
that amount shall be one percent (1%), for FY 2020 that amount shall be one and one-half percent
(1.5%), for FY 2021 that amount shall be two percent (2%), and for FY 2022 that amount shall be
two and one-half percent (2.5%).
(3) A minimum of three dollars ($3.00), subject to inflation, per square foot of building
space shall be dedicated exclusively for maintenance expenditures as defined in § 16-7-36(7).
(c) The department of elementary and secondary education shall be responsible for
establishing a reporting mechanism to ensure the intent of this section is being met. In the event
that a district does not meet its minimum expenditure requirement in a given year, the state shall
direct state housing aid paid pursuant to § 16-7-41 or § 16-105-5, in an amount equal to the shortfall,
to a restricted fund created by the district and dedicated solely to meeting maintenance
requirements.
(d) Whenever any state funds are appropriated for educational purposes, the funds shall be
used for educational purposes only and all state funds appropriated for educational purposes must
be used to supplement any and all money allocated by a city or town for educational purposes and,
in no event, shall state funds be used to supplant, directly or indirectly, any money allocated by a
city or town for educational purposes. All state funds shall be appropriated by the municipality to
the school committee for educational purposes in the same fiscal year in which they are
appropriated at the state level even if the municipality has already adopted a school budget. All
state and local funds unexpended by the end of the fiscal year of appropriation shall remain a
surplus of the school committee and shall not revert to the municipality. Any surplus of state or
LC004210 - Page 2 of 4

local funds appropriated for educational purposes shall not in any respect affect the requirement
that each community contribute local funds in an amount not less than its local contribution for
schools in the previous fiscal year, subject to subsection (a) of this section, and shall not in any
event be deducted from the amount of the local appropriation required to meet the maintenance of
effort provision in any given year.
(e) The State of Rhode Island shall only opt in to the federal school voucher tax credit for
contributions to scholarship-granting organizations established in Pub. L. 119-21, 139 Stat. 72, §
70411 (2025) if the general assembly and the governor both approve such an opt in. The governor
may not opt in nor transmit a list of scholarship granting organizations for this program unless the
general assembly has passed a bill that has been signed by the governor which authorizes this
participation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004210
========
LC004210 - Page 3 of 4